Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-1] Policy and purpose. (a)
Because of the existing and increasing possibility of the occurrence of
disasters or emergencies of unprecedented size and destructiveness resulting
from natural or man-made hazards, and in order to ensure that the preparations
of this State will be adequate to deal with such disasters or emergencies; to
ensure the administration of state and federal programs providing disaster
relief to individuals; and generally to protect the public health, safety, and
welfare and to preserve the lives and property of the people of the State, it
is hereby found and declared to be necessary:

(1) To provide for emergency management by the State,
and to authorize the creation of local organizations for emergency management
in the counties of the State;

(2) To confer upon the governor and upon the mayors
of the counties of the State the emergency powers necessary to prepare for and
respond to emergencies or disasters;

(3) To provide for the rendering of mutual aid among
the counties of the State and with other states and in cooperation with the
federal government with respect to the carrying out of emergency management
functions; and

(4) To provide programs, in cooperation with other
governmental agencies, the private sector, and nonprofit organizations, to
educate and train the public to be prepared for emergencies and disasters.

(b) It is further declared to be the purpose
of this chapter and the policy of the State that all emergency management
functions of this State and its counties be coordinated to the maximum extent
with the comparable functions of the federal government, including its various
departments, and agencies of other states and localities, and with
private-sector and nonprofit organizations, to the end that the most effective
preparation and use may be made of the nation's personnel, resources, and
facilities for dealing with any emergency or disaster that may occur.

(c) It is the intent of the legislature to
provide for and confer comprehensive powers for the purposes stated herein.
This chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes; provided
that this chapter shall not be construed as conferring any power or permitting
any action which is inconsistent with the Constitution and laws of the United States,
but, in so construing this chapter, due consideration shall be given to the
circumstances as they exist from time to time. This chapter shall not be
deemed to have been amended by any act hereafter enacted at the same or any
other session of the legislature, unless this chapter is amended by express
reference. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next